th: ฉนวนกันความร้อนของระบบน้ำ: เก็บอุณหภูมิ; ไม่เก็บอุณหภูมิ; เก็บอุณหภูมิเฉพาะถุงน้ำ; เก็บอุณหภูมิเฉพาะสายยาง; อื่นๆ
fr: Isolation du système d’hydratation: Isotherme; Non isotherme; Réservoir uniquement isotherme; Tuyau uniquement isotherme; Autre
pt-BR: Isolamento do sistema de hidratação: Térmico; Não térmico; Apenas reservatório térmico; Apenas tubo térmico; Outro
en: Hydration system insulation: Insulated; Non-insulated; Reservoir-only insulated; Tube-only insulated; Other
da: Isolering af væskesystem: Isoleret; Ikke-isoleret; Kun beholder isoleret; Kun rør isoleret; Andet
tr: Hidrasyon sistemi yalıtımı: Yalıtımlı; Yalıtımsız; Yalnızca hazne yalıtımlı; Yalnızca hortum yalıtımlı; Diğer
pt-PT: Isolamento do sistema de hidratação: Com isolamento; Sem isolamento; Isolamento apenas no reservatório; Isolamento apenas no tubo; Outro
pl: Izolacja systemu hydracyjnego: Z izolacją; Bez izolacji; Z izolacją tylko zbiornika; Z izolacją tylko rurki; Inne
vi: Cách nhiệt hệ thống đựng nước: Cách nhiệt; Không cách nhiệt; Chỉ cách nhiệt bình chứa; Chỉ cách nhiệt ống; Khác
lt-LT: Hidratacijos sistemos izoliacija: Izoliuotas; Neizoliuotas; Izoliuotas tik rezervuaras; Izoliuotas tik vamzdelis; Kita
es: Aislamiento del sistema de hidratación: Aislado; No aislado; Solo depósito aislado; Solo tubo aislado; Otro
sv: Isolering av vätskesystem: Isolerad; Oisolerad; Endast vätskeblåsan är isolerad; Endast slangen är isolerad; Övrigt
zh-CN: 水具系统保温设计: 保温; 不保温; 仅储水袋保温; 仅软管保温; 其他
sl-SI: Izolacija hidracijskega sistema: Izolirano; Neizolirano; Samo izoliran meh; Samo izolirana cev; Drugo
fi: Nesteytysjärjestelmän eristys: Eristetty; Eristämätön; Vain vesisäiliö eristetty; Vain letku eristetty; Muu
hr-HR: Izolacija hidratacijskog sustava: Izolirano; Neizolirano; Samo izolirani spremnik; Samo izolirana cijev; Ostalo
bg-BG: Изолация на хидратиращата система: Изолирана; Неизолирана; Само изолиран резервоар; Само изолиран маркуч; Други
ru: Теплоизоляция гидрационной системы: Изолированный; Неизолированный; Только изолированный резервуар; Только изолированная трубка; Другое
nb: Isolasjon av drikkesystemet: Isolert; Ikke isolert; Kun isolert blære; Kun isolert slange; Annet
de: Isolierung des Trinksystems: Isoliert; Nicht isoliert; Nur Trinkblase isoliert; Nur Schlauch isoliert; Sonstiges
it: Isolamento del sistema di idratazione: Isolato; Non isolato; Solo serbatoio isolato; Solo tubo isolato; Altro
ja: ハイドレーションシステムの断熱材: 断熱材入り; 断熱材なし; リザーバーのみ断熱; チューブのみ断熱; その他
ko: 수분 공급 시스템 단열: 단열; 비단열; 수조 단열 전용; 튜브 단열 전용; 기타
el: Μόνωση συστήματος ενυδάτωσης: Μονωμένο; Μη μονωμένο; Μόνωση μόνο στο δοχείο; Μόνωση μόνο στο σωλήνα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Izolația sistemului de hidratare: Izolat; Neizolat; Doar rezervor izolat; Doar tub izolat; Altele
nl: Drinksysteem isolatie: Geïsoleerd; Niet-geïsoleerd; Alleen reservoir geïsoleerd; Alleen slang geïsoleerd; Overig
zh-TW: 飲水系統保溫: 具保溫/保冷功能; 無保溫/保冷功能; 僅水袋具保溫/保冷功能; 僅軟管具保溫/保冷功能; 其他
sk-SK: Izolácia hydratačného systému: Izolované; Neizolované; Len izolovaný vak; Len izolovaná hadička; Iné
cs: Izolace hydratačního systému: Izolovaný; Bez izolace; Pouze izolovaný rezervoár; Pouze izolovaná hadička; Ostatní
hu: Hidratáló rendszer szigetelése: Szigetelt; Nem szigetelt; Csak az ivózsák szigetelt; Csak a cső szigetelt; Egyéb